Hawaii statutes.
PART IV.
SERVICES TO ADULTS

Cross References

Medicaid home and community-based waiver programs, see
chapter 346D.

A. Day Care
Center--Repealed

§§346-81 to 346-85 REPEALED. L 2012, c
93, §7.

Cross References

For present provisions, see chapter 321, part XXXIX.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next